Utah statutes.
63M-1-409.   Contingent designations.
(1)  The office may accept applications for, and may at any time grant, a
contingent designation of any county as an enterprise zone for purposes of
seeking a designation of the county as a federally designated zone.
(2)  This designation does not entitle a business operating in that county to
the tax incentives under this part.
